Tennessee statutes. Title 41 Correctional Institutions and Inmates
Part 3

Inmate-Produced Arts and Crafts

41-6-301. Purpose.

It is the purpose of this part to:

Authorize the commissioner of correction to encourage the sale of inmate-produced arts and crafts items; and

Designate the uses to be made of deductions from income earned by those sales.

Acts 1997, ch. 336, § 1.

41-6-302. Part definitions.

As used in the part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of correction; and

“Department” means the department of correction.

Acts 1997, ch. 336, § 1.

41-6-303. Disposition of proceeds from inmate-produced items.

Any inmate producing arts and crafts items for sale pursuant to this part shall, pursuant to policies established by the commissioner, pay from moneys received from sales, and the commissioner may deduct therefrom in the following order:

A maximum of fifteen percent (15%) to the victim of any crimes committed by the inmate to the extent of the victim's loss as determined by a written agreement or judgment under the Criminal Injuries Compensation Act of 1976, compiled in title 29, chapter 13, part 1, and § 40-24-107, and thereafter to any state fund established by law to compensate victims of crime;

Room and board in an amount to be determined by the department;

A percentage of the remainder to be determined by the commissioner, after prior deductions under subdivisions (a)(1) and (2), to the spouse and children or legal guardian of the inmate's children; and

All remaining funds to the inmate's personal trust account.

No inmate may accumulate more than five hundred dollars ($500) in the inmate's personal trust account from arts and crafts sold pursuant to this part. This five-hundred-dollar limitation shall be cumulative and shall remain in effect for as long as the inmate is incarcerated. If funds remain from the sale of arts and crafts after the inmate's five-hundred-dollar personal trust account limitation has been reached, the excess funds shall be distributed as provided in subdivisions (a)(1)-(3).

Any amounts deducted pursuant to this section shall be payable in such manner as the commissioner may by policy prescribe.

Acts 1997, ch. 336, § 1.

Cross-References. Earnings of inmates deposited in trust accounts, establishment and payment of daily room and board rate, § 41-21-511.